Illinois, session 104th, SB3131.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois TRUST Act is amended by changing 5Section 15 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 805/15)7    Sec. 15. Prohibition on enforcing federal civil 8immigration laws. 9    (a) A law enforcement agency or law enforcement official 10shall not detain or continue to detain any individual solely 11on the basis of any immigration detainer or civil immigration 12warrant or otherwise comply with an immigration detainer or 13civil immigration warrant.14    (b) A law enforcement agency or law enforcement official 15shall not stop, arrest, search, detain, or continue to detain 16a person solely based on an individual's citizenship or 17immigration status.18    (c) (Blank).19    (d) A law enforcement agency or law enforcement official 20acting in good faith in compliance with this Section who 21releases a person subject to an immigration detainer or civil 22immigration warrant shall have immunity from any civil or 23criminal liability that might otherwise occur as a result of   SB3131- 2 -LRB104 18680 BDA 32123 b1making the release, with the exception of willful or wanton 2misconduct.3    (e) A law enforcement agency or law enforcement official 4may not inquire about or investigate the citizenship or 5immigration status or place of birth of any individual in the 6agency or official's custody or who has otherwise been stopped 7or detained by the agency or official. Nothing in this 8subsection shall be construed to limit the ability of a law 9enforcement agency or law enforcement official, pursuant to 10State or federal law, to notify a person in the law enforcement 11agency's custody about that person's right to communicate with 12consular officers from that person's country of nationality, 13or facilitate such communication, in accordance with the 14Vienna Convention on Consular Relations or other bilateral 15agreements. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 16limit the ability of a law enforcement agency or law 17enforcement official to request evidence of citizenship or 18immigration status pursuant to the Firearm Owners 19Identification Card Act, the Firearm Concealed Carry Act, 20Article 24 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or 18 United States 21Code Sections 921 through 931.22    (f) Unless otherwise limited by federal law, a law 23enforcement agency or law enforcement official may not deny 24services, benefits, privileges, or opportunities to an 25individual in custody or under probation status, including, 26but not limited to, eligibility for or placement in a lower   SB3131- 3 -LRB104 18680 BDA 32123 b1custody classification, educational, rehabilitative, or 2diversionary programs, on the basis of the individual's 3citizenship or immigration status, the issuance of an 4immigration detainer or civil immigration warrant against the 5individual, or the individual being in immigration removal 6proceedings.7    (g)(1) No law enforcement agency, law enforcement 8official, or any unit of State or local government may enter 9into or renew any contract, intergovernmental service 10agreement, or any other agreement to house or detain 11individuals for federal civil immigration violations.12    (2) Any law enforcement agency, law enforcement official, 13or unit of State or local government with an existing 14contract, intergovernmental agreement, or other agreement, 15whether in whole or in part, that is utilized to house or 16detain individuals for civil immigration violations shall 17exercise the termination provision in the agreement as applied 18to housing or detaining individuals for civil immigration 19violations no later than January 1, 2022.20    (h) Unless presented with a federal criminal warrant, or 21otherwise required by federal law, a law enforcement agency or 22official may not:23        (1) participate, support, or assist in any capacity 24    with an immigration agent's enforcement operations, 25    including any collateral assistance such as coordinating 26    an arrest in a courthouse or other public facility,   SB3131- 4 -LRB104 18680 BDA 32123 b1    providing use of any equipment, transporting any 2    individuals, or establishing a security or traffic 3    perimeter surrounding such operations, or any other 4    on-site support;5        (2) give any immigration agent access, including by 6    telephone, to any individual who is in that agency's 7    custody;8        (3) transfer any person into an immigration agent's 9    custody;10        (4) permit immigration agents use of agency facilities 11    or equipment, including any agency electronic databases 12    not available to the public, for investigative interviews 13    or other investigative or immigration enforcement purpose;14        (5) enter into or maintain any agreement regarding 15    direct access to any electronic database or other 16    data-sharing platform maintained by any law enforcement 17    agency, or otherwise provide such direct access to the 18    U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement, United States 19    Customs and Border Protection or any other federal entity 20    enforcing civil immigration violations;21        (6) provide information in response to any immigration 22    agent's inquiry or request for information regarding any 23    individual in the agency's custody; or24        (7) provide to any immigration agent information not 25    otherwise available to the public relating to an 26    individual's release or contact information, or otherwise   SB3131- 5 -LRB104 18680 BDA 32123 b1    facilitate for an immigration agent to apprehend or 2    question an individual for immigration enforcement.3    (i) Nothing in this Section shall preclude a law 4enforcement official from otherwise executing that official's 5duties in investigating violations of criminal law and 6cooperating in such investigations with federal and other law 7enforcement agencies (including criminal investigations 8conducted by federal Homeland Security Investigations (HSI)) 9in order to ensure public safety. 10    (j) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a 11law enforcement agency or official may take any action 12described in this Section with respect to an individual who is 13not a citizen of the United States and who has been charged or 14convicted of a criminal offense under Illinois law. A law 15enforcement agency or official shall immediately notify an 16immigration agent whenever it has in its custody such an 17individual. 18(Source: P.A. 102-234, eff. 8-2-21; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.